Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4101
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-4101 to 77-4112 shall be known and may be cited as the Employment and Investment Growth Act.

Laws 1987, LB 775, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1234, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 19;

Laws 1999, LB 539, § 4.